Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 1. Forest Products Preference.

Sec. 36.15.010.
Use of local forest products required in projects financed by public money.

In a project financed by state money in which the use of timber, lumber, and manufactured lumber products is required, only timber, lumber, and manufactured lumber products originating in this state from local forests shall be used wherever practicable.

History.

(§ 14-3-1 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 36.15.020.
Insertion of clause in calls for bids and in contracts.

A clause containing the substance of AS

36.15.010

shall be inserted in all calls for bids and in all contracts awarded.

History.

(§ 14-3-2 ACLA 1949)